Hawaii statutes.
§9-3 Duties. The foundation shall:

(1) Assist in coordinating the plans, programs, and
activities of individuals, associations, corporations, and agencies concerned
with the preservation and furtherance of culture and the arts and history and
the humanities;

(2) Establish written standards and criteria by which
grant contracts shall be evaluated;

(3) Appraise the availability, adequacy, and
accessibility of culture and the arts and history and the humanities to all
persons throughout the State and devise programs whereby culture and the arts
and history and the humanities can be brought to those who would otherwise not
have the opportunity to participate;

(4) Stimulate, guide, and promote culture and the
arts and history and the humanities throughout the State;

(5) Devise and recommend legislative and
administrative action for the preservation and furtherance of culture and the
arts and history and the humanities;

(6) Study the availability of private and
governmental grants for the promotion and furtherance of culture and the arts
and history and the humanities;

(7) Through its executive director:

(A) Administer funds allocated by grant,
gift, or bequest to the foundation; accept, hold, disburse, and allocate funds
that may become available from other governmental and private sources; provided
that all those funds shall be disbursed or allocated in compliance with any
specific designation stated by the donor and in the absence of any designation,
the funds shall be disbursed or allocated for the promotion and furtherance of
culture and the arts and history and the humanities; and

(B) Accept, hold, disburse, and allocate
public funds that are made available to the foundation by the legislature for
disbursement or allocation, pursuant to the standards and procedures
established in part II, for the promotion and furtherance of culture and the
arts and history and the humanities;

(8) Submit an annual report with recommendations to
the governor and legislature, prior to February 1, of each year. Annual
reports shall include the total number and amount of gifts and other grants and
income received, payroll disbursements, contracts entered into, and progress
and accomplishments made during the year, including the efforts of the Hawaii
arts education partners and its progress in implementing the Hawaii arts
education strategic plan and the accomplishments of the art in public places
and relocatable works of art programs and the state art museum;

(9) Convene the Hawaii arts education partners, which
is composed of the department of education, the colleges of education and arts
and humanities of the University of Hawaii at Manoa, the Hawaii Association of
Independent Schools, and the Hawaii Alliance for Art Education, to fully
implement the terms of the Hawaii arts education strategic plan;

(10) Display student art works in public buildings,
sponsor student art displays, promote arts education, and in other ways
encourage the development of creative talent among the young people of Hawaii;

(11) In cooperation with qualified organizations,
conduct research, studies, and investigations in the fields of ethnohistory and
the humanities:

(A) Make, publish, and distribute works
documenting the contributions of individual ethnic groups in their relationship
to one another and to the whole population of Hawaii;

(B) Place ethnohistorical and cultural
materials developed by the foundation or received by the foundation as gifts
and donations in public archives, libraries, and other suitable institutions
accessible to the public; and

(C) Maintain a register of the location
of such materials;

(12) Cooperate with and assist the department of land
and natural resources and other state agencies in developing and implementing
programs relating to historic preservation, research, restoration, and
presentation, as well as museum activities;

(13) Establish an individual artist fellowship program
to encourage artists to remain and work in Hawaii and to reaffirm the
importance of Hawaii's artists and their cultural and economic contributions to
the State by:

(A) Recognizing and honoring Hawaii's
exceptionally talented visual and performing artists for their outstanding work
in and commitment to the arts; and

(B) Enabling these artists to further their
artistic goals;

(14) In consultation with the comptroller and
affected agencies and departments, administer the art in public places and
relocatable works of art programs established pursuant to section 103-8.5; and

(15) Administer the operations of the state art museum
established pursuant to section 9-22. [L 1965, c 269, §3; am L 1977, c 112, §1;
am L 1980, c 293, §3; am L 1992, c 181, §4; am L 1993, c 133, §2; am L 1999, c
80, §4; am L 2001, c 306, §2; am L 2004, c 125, §4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next